Washington statutes.
RCW 35.23.560

Waterworks—Construction by city or by district assessments.

All cities and towns within the state, other than cities of the first class, which are empowered to construct waterworks for irrigation and domestic purposes, may do so either by the entire city or by assessment districts as the mayor and council may determine.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.23.560. Prior: 1901 c 117 s 1; RRS s 9526.]